Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2864.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Insurance coverage for lung cancer screening.
(a) The Rhode Island general assembly recognizes that lung cancer remains the leading
cause of cancer deaths in Rhode Island and further that early detection of lung cancer will ensure
that patients get the critical care they need without delay. Accordingly, it is in the best interests of
the people of the state to promote widespread availability by eliminating out-of-pocket costs for
lung cancer screenings.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung
cancer upon the recommendation of a health care provider acting within the provider's scope of
practice, and as recommended by nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the
detection of lung cancer. There shall be no copayment required, and no deductible shall need to be
met for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer. A deductible may be applied to
health plans that are paired with a federally qualified health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
§ 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan from implementing this benefit prior to
January 1, 2027.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines"

means evidence-based, peer reviewed clinical practice guidelines informed by a systematic review
of evidence and an assessment of the benefits, and risks of alternative care options intended to
optimize patient care developed by independent organization professional societies utilizing a
transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict-of-interest policy.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent medical management or utilization
review of the services, including preauthorization, to ensure that such services are consistent with
nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the detection of lung cancer.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Insurance coverage for lung cancer screening.
(a) The Rhode Island general assembly recognizes that lung cancer remains the leading
cause of cancer deaths in Rhode Island and further that early detection of lung cancer will ensure
that patients get the critical care they need without delay. Accordingly, it is in the best interests of
the people of the state to promote widespread availability by eliminating out-of-pocket costs for
lung cancer screenings.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung
cancer upon the recommendation of a health care provider acting within the provider's scope of
practice, and as recommended by nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the
detection of lung cancer. There shall be no copayment required, and no deductible shall need to be
met for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer. A deductible may be applied to
health plans that are paired with a federally qualified health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
§ 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan from implementing this benefit prior to
January 1, 2027.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines"
means evidence-based, peer reviewed clinical practice guidelines informed by a systematic review
of evidence and an assessment of the benefits, and risks of alternative care options intended to
optimize patient care developed by independent organization professional societies utilizing a
transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict-of-interest policy.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent medical management or utilization
review of the services, including preauthorization, to ensure that such services are consistent with
nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the detection of lung cancer.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
LC003699 - Page 2 of 5

Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Insurance coverage for lung cancer screening.
(a) The Rhode Island general assembly recognizes that lung cancer remains the leading
cause of cancer deaths in Rhode Island and further that early detection of lung cancer will ensure
that patients get the critical care they need without delay. Accordingly, it is in the best interests of
the people of the state to promote widespread availability by eliminating out-of-pocket costs for
lung cancer screenings.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung
cancer upon the recommendation of a health care provider acting within the provider's scope of
practice, and as recommended by nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the
detection of lung cancer. There shall be no copayment required, and no deductible shall need to be
met for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer. A deductible may be applied to
health plans that are paired with a federally qualified health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
§ 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan from implementing this benefit prior to
January 1, 2027.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines"
means evidence-based, peer reviewed clinical practice guidelines informed by a systematic review
of evidence and an assessment of the benefits, and risks of alternative care options intended to
optimize patient care developed by independent organization professional societies utilizing a
transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict-of-interest policy.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent medical management or utilization
review of the services, including preauthorization, to ensure that such services are consistent with
nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the detection of lung cancer.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Insurance coverage for lung cancer screening.
(a) The Rhode Island general assembly recognizes that lung cancer remains the leading
cause of cancer deaths in Rhode Island and further that early detection of lung cancer will ensure
that patients get the critical care they need without delay. Accordingly, it is in the best interests of
the people of the state to promote widespread availability by eliminating out-of-pocket costs for
lung cancer screenings.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
LC003699 - Page 3 of 5

coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung
cancer upon the recommendation of a health care provider acting within the provider's scope of
practice, and as recommended by nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the
detection of lung cancer. There shall be no copayment required, and no deductible shall need to be
met for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer. A deductible may be applied to
health plans that are paired with a federally qualified health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
§ 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan from implementing this benefit prior to
January 1, 2027.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines"
means evidence-based, peer reviewed clinical practice guidelines informed by a systematic review
of evidence and an assessment of the benefits, and risks of alternative care options intended to
optimize patient care developed by independent organization professional societies utilizing a
transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict-of-interest policy.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent medical management or utilization
review of the services, including preauthorization, to ensure that such services are consistent with
nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the detection of lung cancer.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003699
========
LC003699 - Page 4 of 5